src/fst/lexicon.tmp.lexc
LEXICON VAIn_CNJ_NULL_PL_SUFFIX   !!= @CODE@ 

+1Pl:%>iyâhk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl:%>iyahk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl:%>iyêk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl:%>kik VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+Dial:%>icik VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>iyit VERB_ENDLEX ;



! ===================================================================================================================
! ===================================================================================================================
! ===================================================================================================================
! ===================================================================================================================


! ********************
!!!! IMPERATIVE !!!!
! ********************

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -w final verbs (refers to the 3 SG form ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================

LEXICON VAIw_IMP_NULL
VAIw_IMP_SG_SUFFIX ;
VAIw_IMP_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VAIw_IMP_SG_SUFFIX
+Imm+2Sg:%>0   VERB_ENDLEX ; ! 
+Del+2Sg:%>hkan   VERB_ENDLEX ; !


LEXICON VAIw_IMP_NULL_PL_SUFFIX
+Imm+12Pl:%>tân	  VERB_ENDLEX ; !
+Imm+2Pl:%>k	 VERB_ENDLEX ; !
+Del+12Pl:%>hkahk   VERB_ENDLEX ; !
+Del+2Pl:%>hkêk   VERB_ENDLEX ; !

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -n final verbs (refers to the 3 SG form ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================

LEXICON VAIn_IMP_NULL
VAIn_IMP_SG_SUFFIX ;
VAIn_IMP_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VAIn_IMP_SG_SUFFIX
+Imm+2Sg:%>i   VERB_ENDLEX ; ! 
+Del+2Sg:%>îhkan   VERB_ENDLEX ; !


LEXICON VAIn_IMP_NULL_PL_SUFFIX
+Imm+12Pl:%>itân	  VERB_ENDLEX ; !
+Imm+2Pl:%>ik	 VERB_ENDLEX ; !
+Del+12Pl:%>îhkahk   VERB_ENDLEX ; !
+Del+2Pl:%>îhkêk   VERB_ENDLEX ; !



! ===================================================================================================================
! ===================================================================================================================
! ===================================================================================================================
! ===================================================================================================================


! ****************************
!!!! FUTURE CONDITIONAL !!!!
! ****************************

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -w final verbs (refers to the 3 SG form ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================

LEXICON VAIae_FUT_CON_NULL   !!= @CODE@ 

VAIw_FUT_CON_NULL_SG_SUFFIX ;
VAIw_FUT_CON_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VAIw_FUT_CON_NULL_SG_SUFFIX   !!= @CODE@ 

+1Sg:%>yâni VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg:%>yani VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg:%>ci VERB_ENDLEX ;

!           ********
! **** Unspecified Actor ****
!           ********

+X:%>hki VERB_ENDLEX ;
!! +X+4Sg:%>yiki # ;

LEXICON VAIw_FUT_CON_NULL_PL_SUFFIX   !!= @CODE@ 

+1Pl:%>yâhki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl:%>yahko VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl:%>yahki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl:%>yêko VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl:%>twâwi VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>yici VERB_ENDLEX ;

!           ********
! **** Unspecified Actor ****
!           ********

+X:%>hkwâwi VERB_ENDLEX ;
!! +X+4Pl:%>yikwâwi # ;

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -n final verbs (refers to the 3 SG form ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================

LEXICON VAIn_FUT_CON_NULL   !!= @CODE@ 

VAIn_FUT_CON_NULL_SG_SUFFIX ;
VAIn_FUT_CON_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VAIn_FUT_CON_NULL_SG_SUFFIX   !!= @CODE@ 

+1Sg:%>iyâni VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg:%>iyani VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg:%>ici VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg:%>ki VERB_ENDLEX ;

!           ********
! **** Unspecified Actor ****
!           ********

+X:%>ki VERB_ENDLEX ;
!! +X+4Sg:%>iyiki # ;

LEXICON VAIn_FUT_CON_NULL_PL_SUFFIX   !!= @CODE@ 

+1Pl:%>iyâhki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl:%>iyahko VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl:%>iyahki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl:%>iyêko VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl:%>itwâwi VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl:%>kwâwi VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>iyici VERB_ENDLEX ;

!           ********
! **** Unspecified Actor ****
!           ********

+X:%>kwâwi VERB_ENDLEX ;
!! +X+4Pl:%>iyikwâwi # ;



!! Transitive inanimate (TI)
!      ===========================
!      ===========================

!!! AEW == Ours: VTI1 == VTIm (we also have a plural only lexicon), VTI2 and VTI3 == VTIw (which goes to VAIw)

!!! STEM CLASS

LEXICON VTIm  !!= * @CODE@ 
+V+TI: VTIm_WICI ;

LEXICON VTIw
+V+TI: VAIae_WICI ;

LEXICON VTIm_PL  !!= * @CODE@  Plural
+V+TI: VTIm_PL_WICI ;

LEXICON VTIae  !!= * @CODE@ NOTE: These inflect just as VAI -w final stems, so they are redirected to those paradigms
+V+TI: VAIae_WICI ; 

LEXICON VTIio  !!= * @CODE@ NOTE: These inflect just as VAI -w final stems, so they are redirected to those paradigms
+V+TI: VAIio_WICI ; 
 

!!! WICI

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -t final verbs (refers to the stem ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================


LEXICON VTIm_WICI
@U.wici.NULL@ VTIm_ORDER ;
@U.wici.wici@+Der/Com+V+TA:@U.wici.wici@môm VTA_ORDER ;

LEXICON VTIm_PL_WICI
@U.wici.NULL@ VTIm_PL_ORDER ;
@U.wici.wici@+Der/Com+V+TA:@U.wici.wici@môm VTA_PL_ORDER ;

!!! ORDERS

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -t final verbs (refers to the stem ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! =========================================================== ! imperative and fut con do not take tense

LEXICON VTIm_ORDER !!= @CODE@ . 
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@ VTIm_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VTIm_CNJ_PERSON ; !
@U.order.imp@+Imp:@U.order.imp@  VTIm_IMP_PERSON ; !
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VTIm_FUT_CON_PERSON ; !

LEXICON VTIm_PL_ORDER !!= @CODE@ plural only NOTE: imperative and fut con go straight to person lexica
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@ VTIm_PL_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VTIm_PL_CNJ_PERSON ; !
@U.order.imp@+Imp:@U.order.imp@  VTIm_PL_IMP_PERSON ; !
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VTIm_PL_FUT_CON_PERSON ; !

!!! TENSES

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -t final verbs (refers to the stem ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================


LEXICON VTIm_IND_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VTIm_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VTIm_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.FutDef@+Fut+Def:@U.tense.FutDef@ VTIm_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VTIm_IND_PERSON ; !

LEXICON VTIm_CNJ_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VTIm_CNJ_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VTIm_CNJ_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VTIm_CNJ_PERSON ; !intentional

LEXICON VTIm_PL_IND_TENSE !!= @CODE@ plural only
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VTIm_PL_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VTIm_PL_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.FutDef@+Fut+Def:@U.tense.FutDef@ VTIm_PL_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VTIm_PL_IND_PERSON ; !

LEXICON VERBSTEMS
akokwaham:akokwaha VTIm ;
akotâw:akotâ VTIw ;
apahkwâtam:apahkwâta VTIm ;
asêtisaham:asêtisaha VTIm ;
askîwiskamwak:askîwiska VTIm_PL ;
astâw:astâ VTIw ;
aswaham:aswaha VTIm ;
ayamihtôtam:ayamihtôta VTIm ;
ayâw:ayâ VTIw ;
ayiwâkêyihtam:aýiwâkêýihta VTIm ;
âhcipicîhtâw:âhcipicîhtâ VTIw ;
âhtahpitam:âhtahpita VTIm ;
âkayâsîwastâw:âkaýâsîwastâ VTIw ;
âniskokwâtam:âniskokwâta VTIm ;
ânwêhtaskiw:ânwêhtaski VTIw ;
âsipitam:âsipita VTIm ;
âsowohtatâw:âsowohtatâ VTIw ;
âyimêyihtam:âýimêýihta VTIm ;
cahkihtitâw:cahkihtitâ VTIw ;
câhcâmosam:câhcâmosa VTIm ;
cîhkîstam:cîhkîsta VTIm ;
cîpipitâw:cîpipitâ VTIw ;
ihkatêyihtam:ihkatêýihta VTIm ;
isîhkam:isîhka VTIm ;
iskohtâw:iskohtâ VTIw ;
itam:ita VTIm ;
itastâw:itastâ VTIw ;
itêyihtam:itêýihta VTIm ;
kakwâtakêyihtam:kakwâtakêýihta VTIm ;
kakwâyakihtâw:kakwâýakihtâ VTIw ;
kaskâpasam:kaskâpasa VTIm ;
kaskitêwihtâw:kaskitêwihtâ VTIw ;
kâkîcitotam:kâkîcitota VTIm ;
kâsîhtitâw:kâsîhtitâ VTIw ;
kihcâspinatam:kihcâspinata VTIm ;
kinohtâw:kinohtâ VTIw ;
kisâkamisam:kisâkamisa VTIm ;
kisiskâpayihtâw:kisiskâpaýihtâ VTIw ;
kispakisîhtâw:kispakisîhtâ VTIw ;
kistaham:kistaha VTIm ;
kitohtâw:kitohtâ VTIw ;
kîhkihtâw:kîhkihtâ VTIw ;
kîhkitam:kîhkita VTIm ;
kîskâyowêtaham:kîskâýowêtaha VTIm ;
kîsôhtâw:kîsôhtâ VTIw ;
kosâpêskam:kosâpêska VTIm ;
kosikohtâw:kosikohtâ VTIw ;
kôkîhtâw:kôkîhtâ VTIw ;
kwayakonam:kwaýakona VTIm ;
kwayaskopayihtâw:kwayaskopaýihtâ VTIw ;
kwayâtisîhtâw:kwayâtisîhtâ VTIw ;
kwêtipiwêpaham:kwêtipiwêpaha VTIm ;
kwîtâpacihtâw:kwîtâpacihtâ VTIw ;
manâ-pîkonam:manâ-pîkona VTIm ;
masinihtatâw:masinihtatâ VTIw ;
matwêpitam:matwêpita VTIm ;
matwêwêhtâw:matwêwêhtâ VTIw ;
mâmawastâw:mâmawastâ VTIw ;
mâmawi-nâtisaham:mâmawi-nâtisaha VTIm ;
mâmawohkamwak:mâmawohka VTIm_PL ;
mâmawôpîtotamwak:mâmawôpîtota VTIm_PL ;
mâyinâkohtâw:mâýinâkohtâ VTIw ;
mêkwâham:mêkwâha VTIm ;
micimoskiwahtâw:micimoskiwahtâ VTIw ;
mihcêtohkamwak:mihcêtohka VTIm_PL ;
mihtawêyihtam:mihtawêýihta VTIm ;
misahtâw:misahtâ VTIw ;
miyâhtam:miýâhta VTIm ;
miyo-âpacihtâw:miýo-âpacihtâ VTIw ;
miyostâw:miýostâ VTIw ;
mîskwaham:mîskwaha VTIm ;
mosci-kîskipotâw:mosci-kîskipotâ VTIw ;
mwêstâsihtam:mwêstâsihta VTIm ;
nahêkâcihtâw:nahêkâcihtâ VTIw ;
nakiskâtam:nakiskâta VTIm ;
nanâtawihtâw:nanâtawihtâ VTIw ;
naskwêwasihtam:naskwêwasihta VTIm ;
naspâtastâw:naspâtastâ VTIw ;
nayêhtâwêyihtam:nayêhtâwêýihta VTIm ;
nânâwayôstâw:nânâwayôstâ VTIw ;
nâtwâskam:nâtwâska VTIm ;
nêhpêmastâw:nêhpêmastâ VTIw ;
nisitohtamohtâw:nisitohtamohtâ VTIw ;
nîhcipitam:nîhcipita VTIm ;
nîkânohtatâw:nîkânohtatâ VTIw ;
ocihciminam:ocihcimina VTIm ;
ohcikawihtâw:ohcikawihtâ VTIw ;
osâmipitam:osâmipita VTIm ;
osîhtâw:osîhtâ VTIw ;
pahkwacipitam:pahkwacipita VTIm ;
pahpawipayihtâw:pahpawipaýihtâ VTIw ;
papakisâwâtam:papakisâwâta VTIm ;
papâmitohtatâw:papâmitohtatâ VTIw ;
pawaham:pawaha VTIm ;
pâh-piskihcastâw:pâh-piskihcastâ VTIw ;
pâstâmototam:pâstâmotota VTIm ;
pê-wayawîhtatâw:pê-waýawîhtatâ VTIw ;
pêyako-itêyihtamwak:pêyako-itêýihta VTIm_PL ;
pihcipohtâw:pihcipohtâ VTIw ;
pimâtisîtotam:pimâtisîtota VTIm ;
pimitâskostâw:pimitâskostâ VTIw ;
pîcicipitam:pîcicipita VTIm ;
pîhtâpâwatâw:pîhtâpâwatâ VTIw ;
pîkowêpiskam:pîkowêpiska VTIm ;
pîstêwaciwahtâw:pîstêwaciwahtâ VTIw ;
poscipitam:poscipita VTIm ;
pôskopayihtâw:pôskopaýihtâ VTIw ;
sakinam:sakina VTIm ;
sâmaskêhtitâw:sâmaskêhtitâ VTIw ;
sâpowêpinam:sâpowêpina VTIm ;
sikohtatâw:sikohtatâ VTIw ;
sinikohtakaham:sinikohtakaha VTIm ;
sîhtamohtâw:sîhtamohtâ VTIw ;
sîhtiskam:sîhtiska VTIm ;
sîwaham:sîwaha VTIm ;
sôhkâkamihtâw:sôhkâkamihtâ VTIw ;
tahkastâw:tahkastâ VTIw ;
tahkwâskwêhpitam:tahkwâskwêhpita VTIm ;
takahkwêwêhtitâw:takahkwêwêhtitâ VTIw ;
tawîstam:tawîsta VTIm ;
tâpasinahikêpayihtâw:tâpasinahikêpaýihtâ VTIw ;
tâwinam:tâwina VTIm ;
têpastâw:têpastâ VTIw ;
tipinawaham:tipinawaha VTIm ;
tômihtâw:tômihtâ VTIw ;
wanotinam:wanotina VTIm ;
wawêyîhtâw:wawêyîhtâ VTIw ;
wâkipitam:wâkipita VTIm ;
wâsakâpîstamwak:wâsakâpîsta VTIm_PL ;
wâsakâskamwak:wâsakâska VTIm_PL ;
wêhcihtâw:wêhcihtâ VTIw ;
wêpasinaham:wêpasinaha VTIm ;
wîhkwêkâpawîstamwak:wîhkwêkâpawîsta VTIm_PL ;
wîhtam:wîhta VTIm ;
wînastâw:wînastâ VTIw ;
yâyikisam:ýâýikisa VTIm ;
